Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 3. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 08.64.364.
Prescription of drugs without physical examination.

The board may not impose disciplinary sanctions on a physician or physician assistant for rendering a diagnosis, providing treatment, or prescribing, dispensing, or administering a prescription drug that is not a controlled substance to a person without conducting a physical examination if

the physician, physician assistant, or another licensed health care provider in the medical practice is available to provide follow-up care; and

the physician or physician assistant requests that the person consent to sending a copy of all records of the encounter to the person’s primary care provider if the prescribing physician or physician assistant is not the person’s primary care provider and, if the person consents, the physician or physician assistant sends the records to the person’s primary care provider.

The board may not impose disciplinary sanctions on a physician or physician assistant for prescribing, dispensing, or administering a prescription drug that is a controlled substance or botulinum toxin if the requirements under (a) of this section and AS

08.64.363

are met and the physician or physician assistant prescribes, dispenses, or administers the controlled substance or botulinum toxin when an appropriate licensed health care provider is present with the patient to assist the physician or physician assistant with examination, diagnosis, and treatment.

Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section,

a physician may not prescribe, dispense, or administer an abortion-inducing drug under (a) of this section unless the physician complies with AS

18.16.010

; and

a physician or physician assistant may not prescribe, dispense, or administer a prescription drug in response to an Internet questionnaire or electronic mail message to a person with whom the physician or physician assistant does not have a prior physician-patient relationship.

In this section,

“controlled substance” has the meaning given in AS

11.71.900

;

“prescription drug” has the meaning given in AS

08.80.480

;

“primary care provider” has the meaning given in AS

21.07.250

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 115 SLA 2014; am § 8, 9 ch 25 SLA 2016; am § 17 ch 2 SSSLA 2017; am §§
2 — 4 ch 18 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsections (b) and (c) were enacted as (c) and (d); relettered in 2017, at which time subsection (b) was relettered as (d) and a conforming change was made to (c).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective September 19, 2016, in (a) inserted “rendering a diagnosis, providing treatment, or” preceding “prescribing” and “that is not a controlled substance” following “prescription drug”; deleted (a)(1); in (a)(2), deleted “The physician is located in this state and” at the beginning of the paragraph; inserted “(2) the physician requests that” following “follow-up care; and”; deleted “(3)”; substituted “consent” for “consents”; inserted “, if the patient consents,” preceding “the physician sends”; added (b) and (c).

The 2019 amendment, effective March 1, 2020, in (a), inserted “or physician assistant” in the introductory paragraph, in (a)(1), substituted “physician, physician assistant, or another licensed health care provided in the medical practice” for “physician or another licensed health care provider or physician in the physician’s group practice,” in (a)(2), inserted “or physician assistant” in three places, substituted “if the person” for “in the patient”; in (b), inserted “or physician assistant” in three places; in (c), relocated the (1) designation to include “a physician man not,” substituted “and” for “or” at the end of (c)(1), in (c)(2), added “a physician or physician assistant may not” at the beginning and inserted “or physician assistant.”

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 115, SLA 2014, which enacted this section, took effect on November 28, 2014.

Sec. 08.64.365.
Physicians acting under emergency circumstances. [Repealed, § 46 ch 102 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 08.64.366.
Liability for services rendered by a mobile intensive care paramedic.

History.

[Repealed, § 18 ch 29 SLA 2021.]

Sec. 08.64.367.
Use of amygdalin (laetrile); investigational drugs, biological products, or devices.

A physician may not be subject to disciplinary action by the board for prescribing or administering amygdalin (laetrile) to a patient under the physician’s care who has requested the substance unless the board in a hearing conducted under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) has made a formal finding that the substance is harmful.

A hospital or health facility may not interfere with the physician-patient relationship by restricting or forbidding the use of amygdalin (laetrile) when prescribed or administered by a physician and requested by a patient unless the substance as prescribed or administered by the physician is found to be harmful by the board in a hearing conducted under the provisions of AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

A physician may not be subject to disciplinary action by the board for prescribing, dispensing, or administering an investigational drug, biological product, or device, or providing related treatment, to a patient for the purpose of sustaining the patient’s life if the patient

has a terminal illness;

is ineligible or unable to participate in a current clinical trial for the investigational drug, biological product, or device;

has considered, after consultation with the physician, all other treatment options currently approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration; and

has given informed consent in writing for the use of the investigational drug, biological product, or device.

In this section,

“investigational drug, biological product, or device” means a drug, biological product, or device that has successfully completed Phase 1 studies of clinical trials for investigation and remains in ongoing clinical trials under Phase 2 or Phase 3 or is in the new drug application process following Phase 3 of clinical trials, but has not been approved for general use by the United States Food and Drug Administration;

“terminal illness” means a disease that, without life-sustaining procedures, will result in death in the near future or a state of permanent unconsciousness from which recovery is unlikely.

History.

(§§ 1, 2 ch 227 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 53 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For immunity relating to the use or nonuse of investigational drugs, biological products, and devices, see AS

09.65.325

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective October 11, 2018, added (c) and (d).

Sec. 08.64.368.
Permits for isolated areas. [Repealed, § 27 ch 148 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 08.64.369.
Health care professionals to report certain injuries.

A health care professional who initially treats or attends to a person with an injury described in (b) of this section shall make certain that an oral report of the injury is made promptly to the Department of Public Safety, a local law enforcement agency, or a village public safety officer. The health care professional shall make certain that a written report of an injury described in (b)(1) or (2) of this section is submitted to the Department of Public Safety within three working days after the person is treated. The report shall be on a form provided by the Department of Public Safety.

The following injuries shall be reported under (a) of this section:

second or third degree burns to five percent or more of a patient’s body;

a burn to a patient’s upper respiratory tract or laryngeal edema due to the inhalation of super-heated air;

a bullet wound, powder burn, or other injury apparently caused by the discharge of a firearm;

an injury apparently caused by a knife, axe, or other sharp or pointed instrument, unless the injury was clearly accidental; and

an injury that is likely to cause the death of the patient, unless the injury was clearly accidental.

A person who, in good faith, makes a report under this section, or who participates in judicial proceedings related to a report under this section, is immune from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise be incurred as a result of making such a report or participating in the judicial proceedings.

In this section, “health care professional” includes an emergency medical technician certified under AS 18.08, health aide, physician, nurse, mobile intensive care paramedic licensed under AS 18.08, and physician assistant, but does not include a practitioner of religious healing.

History.

(§ 1 ch 88 SLA 1988; am § 5 ch 36 SLA 1993; am § 6 ch 29 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 08.64.337.
Renumbered in 1988.

In 2001, in (d) of this section “physician assistant” was substituted for “physician’s assistant” to correct a manifest error.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective January 1, 2022, in (d), inserted “licensed under AS 18.08” following “mobile intensive care paramedic”.